Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Article 2. Height, Width, and Length

§ 1431.
Height and width limits.

Except for the provisions of subsection (c) of this section, motor vehicles and loads shall not exceed eight and one-half feet in width or 13 feet six inches in height. The term width shall mean the total width of the vehicle and load, excluding safety devices as determined by the Commissioner that may extend up to three inches on each side of the vehicle. The height and width limits of this section shall not apply to snow plows, road machines, oilers, traction engines, tractors, rollers, power shovels, dump wagons, trucks, highway building equipment, and road-making appliances employed on highway maintenance or on highway construction when operated within a construction area, or to vehicles employed by municipalities for transportation and disposal of nontoxic residual waste sludge from wastewater and water treatment facilities while used for those purposes, nor shall the limits apply to traction engines, tractor, trailer, or motor trucks operated on a public highway under a permit from the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles as provided in section 1400 of this title. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the use of the stop arm described in section 1281a of this title, and no permit shall be required.

In his or her discretion, with or without hearing, the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles, or his or her agent, upon application, may issue annually to dealers in farm tractors or other farm implements overwidth permits to transport or draw upon a highway such farm implements as are more than eight and one-half feet in width but not more than 13 feet in width, when such operation is necessary to the conduct of such business, during the period from sunrise to sunset, provided at least two red flags not smaller than 12 inches square be displayed on the left front and rear of each vehicle or implement or combination thereof in such manner as to be clearly visible from the front and rear for a distance of at least 500 feet, except that no vehicles, implements, or combinations thereof shall be operated on any highway after 10:00 a.m. on any Sunday or legal holiday, except on trips not in excess of two miles, nor upon any highway at any time on which operation is prohibited by order of the Commissioner.

The total outside width of a motor home, as defined in

32 V.S.A. § 8902(11)

, or a trailer coach as defined in subdivision 4(41) of this title, may exceed eight and one-half feet if the excess width is attributable to an appurtenance that extends no more than six inches beyond the body of the vehicle. The term “appurtenance” does not include any item that is temporarily affixed to the exterior of the vehicle by the vehicle’s owner for the purpose of transporting the item from one location to another, but does include the following:

an awning and its support hardware; and

any appendage that is intended to be an integral part of a motor home or trailer coach that is installed by a manufacturer or dealer.

A person, firm, or corporation whose land is divided by a public highway may operate across the highway, at approximate right angles to the centerline, an unregistered vehicle with or without a load having a width in excess of eight and one-half feet or a height in excess of 13 feet six inches and which, if used on highway construction, would be defined as motorized highway building equipment, provided that the person, firm, or corporation shall first:
(d) (1) A person, firm, or corporation whose land is divided by a public highway may operate across the highway, at approximate right angles to the centerline, an unregistered vehicle with or without a load having a width in excess of eight and one-half feet or a height in excess of 13 feet six inches and which, if used on highway construction, would be defined as motorized highway building equipment, provided that the person, firm, or corporation shall first:

have applied to and received from the selectboard of the town or the aldermen or city council of the city in which the land and highway are located a permit in writing specifying the vehicle covered and the point where, time when, and under what conditions the crossing may be made;

have applied to and received from the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles a certificate in writing that the vehicle listed in the permit issued by the selectboard or aldermen or city council meets the conditions the Commissioner may impose as to type and size and, further, that the operation of it across the highway will not damage the highway.

The Commissioner may impose conditions regarding size of load or highway surface protection as he or she deems necessary.

A fee of $35.00 shall be paid to the town or city for each permit and the permit shall not cover more than one vehicle. The permit shall be valid for a period of one year from the date of issue. A similar fee of $35.00 shall be paid to the State for each certificate issued by the Commissioner and the certificate shall not cover more than one vehicle and shall be valid for a period of one year from the date of issue.

Provided that the terms and conditions are complied with, no registration of the vehicle shall be required under any other section of this title, nor shall permits of any kind or type be required under any other section of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended

1961, No. 286

, § 5, eff. Aug. 1, 1961;

1963, No. 62

, § 2, eff. April 30, 1963;

1969, No. 49

, § 2;

1969, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. March 25, 1970;

1971, No. 55

, § 1;

1975, No. 213

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 1, 1976;

1983, No. 74

, § 4, eff. April 28, 1983;

1987, No. 95

, § 4, eff. June 23, 1987;

2001, No. 18

, § 2, eff. May 8, 2001;

2015, No. 47

, § 33;

2017, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), § 15.

§ 1432.
Length of vehicles.

Operation of vehicles with or without a trailer or semitrailer. No motor vehicle without a trailer or semitrailer attached, which is longer than 46 feet overall, shall be operated upon any highway except under special permission from the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles. A motor vehicle with a trailer or semitrailer shall be operated, with regard to the length of the vehicle, pursuant to this section. If there is a trailer or semitrailer, the distance between the kingpin of the semitrailer to the center of the rearmost axle group shall not exceed 41 feet. An “axle group” is defined as two or more axles where the centers of all the axles are spaced at an equal distance apart.

Vehicles with a trailer or semitrailer not exceeding 75 feet. If the overall length of a vehicle with a trailer or semitrailer does not exceed 75 feet, it may be operated without a permit.

A receiver or shipper of goods located in Vermont may request from the Agency of Transportation access to a State highway for a commercial motor vehicle where the overall length exceeds 75 feet. If the total vehicle length is in excess of 75 feet or the distance from the steering axle to the rearmost tractor axle is longer than 25 feet, a permit may be requested from the Commissioner. In that event, the Agency of Transportation shall review the route or routes requested, making its determination for approval based on safety and engineering considerations, after considering input from local government and regional planning commissions or the metropolitan planning organization. The Agency shall maintain consistency in its application of acceptable highway geometry when approving other routes. The Agency may authorize safety precautions on these highways, if warranted, which shall include precautionary signage, intelligent transportation system signage, special speed limits, and use of flashing lights.

Vehicles with a trailer or semitrailer longer than 75 feet. If the overall length of a vehicle with a trailer or semitrailer is longer than 75 feet, a permit may be issued pursuant to subdivision 1402(b)(1) of this title.

Rear-end protective devices on trailers. A trailer or semitrailer not in excess of 53 feet may be operated provided the semitrailer is equipped with a rear-end protective device of substantial construction consisting of a continuous lateral beam extending to within four inches of the lateral extremities of the semitrailer and located not more than 22 inches from the surface as measured with the vehicle empty and on a level surface.

Operation on U.S. Route 4.

Subsection (c) repealed effective July 1, 2022.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, vehicles with a trailer or semitrailer that are longer than 68 feet but not longer than 75 feet may be operated with a single or multiple trip overlength permit issued at no cost by the Department of Motor Vehicles or, for a fee, by an entity authorized in subsection 1400(d) of this title on U.S. Route 4 from the New Hampshire state line to the junction of VT Route 100 south, provided the distance from the kingpin of the semitrailer to the center of the rearmost axle group is not greater than 41 feet.

Operation of pole semitrailers. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to prevent the operation of so-called pole dinkeys or pole semitrailers when being used to support the ends of poles, timbers, pipes, or structural members capable, generally, of sustaining themselves as beams between the supporting connections, the overall length of which may exceed 75 feet under special permission from the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles.

Operation on interstate highways. Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, on the Dwight D. Eisenhower National System of Interstate and Defense Highways and those classes of qualifying Federal-aid Primary System highways as designated by the Secretary of the U.S. Department of Transportation, and on highways leading to or from the Dwight D. Eisenhower National System of Interstate and Defense Highways for a distance of one mile, unless the Agency of Transportation finds the use of a specific highway to be unsafe, no overall length limits for tractor-semitrailer or tractor semitrailer-trailer combination shall apply. On these highways, no semitrailer in a tractor-semitrailer combination longer than 53 feet and no trailer or semitrailer in a tractor-semitrailer-trailer combination longer than 28 feet shall be operated. However, the limits established by this section shall not be construed in such a manner as to prohibit the use of semitrailers in a tractor-semitrailer combination of such dimensions as were in actual and lawful use in this State on December 1, 1982.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 99

;

1963, No. 62

, § 3, eff. April 30, 1963;

1971, No. 55

, § 2;

1973, No. 15

;

1977, No. 41

, § 3, eff. April 19, 1977;

1983, No. 74

, § 2, eff. April 28, 1983;

1985, No. 124

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. April 18, 1986;

1987, No. 95

, § 5, eff. June 23, 1987;

1987, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 27, 1988;

1991, No. 65

, eff. June 18, 1991;

1995, No. 183

(Adj. Sess.), § 18g, eff. May 22, 1996;

1997, No. 120

(Adj. Sess.), § 9c;

1999, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. Aug. 1, 2000;

2007, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 43;

2009, No. 50

, § 102;

2011, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2017, No. 71

, § 16, eff. June 8, 2017;

2021, No. 20

, § 247;

2021, No. 55

, § 10, eff. July 1, 2022.

§ 1433.
Reasonable access.

Reasonable access, within the meaning of

19 V.S.A. § 1111

, shall be permitted to those vehicles operating pursuant to the provisions of subsections 1302(c) and 1432(e) of this title between the Dwight D. Eisenhower National System of Interstate and Defense Highways and any other qualifying Federal-aid Primary System highways, as designated by the Secretary of the U.S. Department of Transportation and the Vermont Secretary of Transportation, and terminals; facilities for food, fuel, repairs, and rest; and points of loading and unloading for household goods carriers. The Vermont Secretary of Transportation shall by rule pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 either designate those portions of the public highways over which such reasonable access shall be permitted or provide for the issuance of permits to allow reasonable access. However, permits shall not be required for tractor-semi-trailer combinations designed for the transportation of automobiles and having provision for transporting motor vehicles on part of the power unit provided the combinations comply with the provisions of subsection 1432(a) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 74

, § 3, eff. April 28, 1983; amended

1987, No. 95

, § 6, eff. June 23, 1987;

2015, No. 47

, § 35;

2019, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 15;

2021, No. 20

, § 248.

§ 1434.
Penalties.

The operation of a vehicle on a public highway in excess of the height, width, or length limits as prescribed in section 1431 or 1432 of this title without first obtaining a permit to operate the vehicle, whether or not a permit is available, shall be a traffic violation as defined in section 2302 of this title. A violation shall be punishable by a civil penalty of $300.00 for a first offense, $600.00 for a second offense within a two-year period, and $800.00 for a third or subsequent offense within a two-year period.

The operation of a vehicle on a public highway in excess of the legal height, width, or length as prescribed in section 1431 or 1432 of this title in violation of the terms of a permit issued in conformance with section 1400 of this title shall be a traffic violation as defined in section 2302 of this title and shall be punishable by a civil penalty of $300.00 for a first offense, $600.00 for a second offense within a two-year period, and $800.00 for a third or subsequent offense within a two-year period.

In the case of a violation under subsection (a) of this section, the Commissioner may refuse to issue a permit to the violator under section 1400 of this title for a period not to exceed three months, if the owner or lessee commits four or more violations within a two-year period. If the holder of a permit commits four or more violations under subsection (b) of this section within a two-year period, the Commissioner may suspend, for a period not to exceed three months, any permit issued to the violator under section 1400 of this title. For the purposes of this section, the owner or lessee of the vehicle shall be considered the holder of, or applicant for, the permit.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 119

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. April 25, 1996; amended

1997, No. 46

, § 5;

1997, No. 120

(Adj. Sess.), § 9e;

2015, No. 47

, § 34;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 205.

§ 1435.
Enforcement plan.

It is the intention of the General Assembly that the Departments of Motor Vehicles and Public Safety, in conjunction with other law enforcement entities throughout the State, produce a coordinated statewide truck enforcement, safety, and training plan. The plan shall provide for a common philosophy and approach to commercial vehicle enforcement while recognizing the different focus and responsibilities of each entity. The plan shall also provide for training of commercial vehicle enforcement officers as well as a process to ensure effective communication of information between enforcement personnel, the over dimension permitting unit, and members of the trucking industry. In addition, the plan shall provide for periodic informational meetings with municipalities, groups of municipalities, regional entities, and the general public.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 46

, § 6; amended

1997, No. 120

(Adj. Sess.), § 9g.

§ 1436.
Statewide Municipal Commercial Motor Vehicle Enforcement Fund.

A Statewide Municipal Commercial Motor Vehicle Enforcement Fund is created for the purpose of supporting commercial motor vehicle law enforcement initiatives in the State. The Fund shall be administered by the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles. Municipalities may apply to the Commissioner on forms supplied by the Department of Motor Vehicles. Funds distributed to municipalities, which shall not exceed $12,000.00 annually per municipality under this section, shall be used for training of municipal law enforcement officers for commercial motor vehicle enforcement, temporary replacement officers for those municipal law enforcement officers receiving commercial motor vehicle enforcement training, and other municipal commercial motor vehicle enforcement uses as determined by the Commissioner. The Commissioner shall ensure that the activities of the commercial motor vehicle law enforcement initiative are consistent with those of the enforcement plan produced pursuant to section 1435 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 120

(Adj. Sess.), § 9h; amended

1999, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 18;

2003, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 52, eff. June 9, 2004.

§ 1437.
Exception for towaway trailer transporter combination.

As used in this section:

“Towaway trailer transporter combination” means a combination of vehicles consisting of a trailer transporter towing unit and two trailers or semitrailers with a total weight that does not exceed 26,000 pounds and in which the trailers or semitrailers carry no property and constitute inventory property of a manufacturer, distributor, or dealer of such trailers or semitrailers.

“Trailer transporter towing unit” means a power unit that is not used to carry property when operating in a towaway trailer transporter combination.

Notwithstanding sections 1391-1398 of this title, a towaway trailer transporter combination may be operated on the Dwight D. Eisenhower System of Interstate and Defense Highways, those classes of qualifying Federal-aid Primary System highways as designated by the Secretary of the U.S. Department of Transportation, and on highways leading to or from the Dwight D. Eisenhower System of Interstate and Defense Highways for a distance of one mile or less without a permit if the overall length does not exceed 82 feet unless the Vermont Secretary of Transportation finds the use of a specific highway to be unsafe.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 15a.